ko: 휠체어 유형: 비만; 전자식; 접기; 경량; 수동; 소아과; 리클라이닝; 수송; 기타
nb: Rullestoltype: Bariatrisk; Elektrisk; Sammenleggbar; Lett; Manuell; Pediatrisk; Tilbakelent; Transport; Annet
zh-TW: 輪椅類型: 肥胖症專用; 電動式; 折疊式; 輕盈; 手動; 兒童成長; 仰躺式; 運輸; 其他
da: Kørestolstype: Bariatrisk; Elektrisk; Foldbar; Letvægts; Manuel; Pædiatrisk; Tilbagelænet; Transport; Andet
es: Tipo de silla de ruedas: Bariátrico; Eléctrico; Plegable; Liviano; Manual; Pediátrico; Reclinable; De transporte; Otros
el: Τύπος αναπηρικού αμαξιδίου: Βαριατρική; Ηλεκτρική; Αναδιπλούμενη; Μικρού βάρους; Μη αυτόματος; Παιδιατρικός; Ξαπλωμένος; Μεταφορά; Άλλο
th: ประเภทวีลแชร์: สำหรับคนอ้วน; ไฟฟ้า; ขอบพับ; น้ำหนักเบา; มือเข็น; สำหรับเด็ก; ปรับนอนได้; สำหรับเดินทาง; อื่นๆ
de: Rollstuhltyp: Bariatrisch; Elektrisch; Faltbar; Leicht; Manuell; Pädiatrisch; Verstellbar; Transport; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Tipo de cadeira de rodas: Bariátrica; Elétrica; Dobrável; Leve; Manual; Pediátrica; Reclinável; Transporte; Outro
en: Wheelchair type: Bariatric; Electric; Folding; Lightweight; Manual; Pediatric; Reclining; Transport; Other
hu: Kerekesszék típusa: Túlsúlyos; Elektromos; Összecsukható; Könnyű; Manuális; Gyermek; Dönthető; Szállítás; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de cadeira de rodas: Bariátrico; Elétrico; Dobrável; Leveza; Manual; Pediátrico; Reclinado; Transporte; Outro
ja: 車椅子の種類: 肥満者用; 電気; 折りたたみ; 軽量; 手動; 小児用; リクライニング; トランスポート; その他
ro-RO: Tip scaun cu rotile: Bariatric; Electric; Pliabil; Ușor; Manual; Pediatric; Înclinat; Transport; Altele
tr: Tekerlekli Sandalye Tipi: Bariatrik; Akülü; Katlanabilir; Hafif; Manuel; Pediyatrik; Sırtı yatan; Taşıma amaçlı; Diğer
fr: Type de fauteuil roulant: Bariatrique; Électrique; Pliant; Léger; Manuel; Pédiatrique; Inclinable; Transport; Autre
it: Tipo di sedia a rotelle: Bariatrica; Elettrico; Pieghevole; Leggero; Manuale; Pediatrica; Reclinabile; Trasporto; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta invalidskega vozička: Bariatrični; Električna; Zložljiv; Lahek; Ročni; Pediatrični; Nagibni sedež; Transportni; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип инвалидна количка: Бариатричен; Електрически; Сгъваем; Олекотен; Ръчен; Педиатричен; Накланящ се; Транспортен; Други
ru: Тип инвалидной коляски: Бариатрический; Электрический; Складной; Легкий; Ручной; Детский; Откидывающийся; Транспортировочный; Другой
cs: Typ invalidního vozíku: Bariatrické; Elektrický; Skládací; Lehké; Ruční; Pediatrické; Polohovací; Přepravní; Jiné
pl: Typ wózka inwalidzkiego: Bariatryczny; Elektryczny; Składanie; Lekkie; Ręczny; Pediatria; Odchylany; Transport; Inne
nl: Rolstoeltype: Bariatrisch; Elektrisch; Inklapbaar; Lichtgewicht; Handmatig; Pediatrisch; Liggend; Transport; Andere
vi: Loại xe lăn: Xe lăn cho bệnh nhân béo phì; Xe lăn điện; Xe lăn gấp; Hạng nhẹ; Xe lăn thủ công; Xe lăn cho bệnh nhi; Xe lăn ngả; Xe lăn vận chuyển; Khác
lt-LT: Vežimėlio tipas: Bariatrinis; Elektrinis; Sulankstomas; Skystas; Rankinis; Vaikas; Atlošiama sėdynė; Transportavimas; Kita
fi: Pyörätuolityyppi: Bariatrinen; Sähkö; Taittuva; Kevyt; Manuaalinen; Pediatrinen; Makuuasentoinen; Kuljetus; Muu
sv: Rullstolstyp: Bariatrisk; Elektrisk; Hopfällbar; Lättvikt; Manuell; Pediatrisk; Liggande; Transport; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ invalidného vozíka: Bariatrický; Elektrický; Skladací; Ľahký; Manuálny; Pediatrický; Ležiaci; Doprava; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta invalidskih kolica: Barijatrijska; Električna; Sklopiva; Lagana; Ručno; Pedijatrijska; S pomičnim naslonom; Transportna; Ostalo
zh-CN: 轮椅类型: 肥胖患者轮椅; 电动; 折叠式的; 轻质; 手动; 儿童用; 斜躺式; 助推型; 其他